tests/runtime/slice.sbl
// Test slice-related operations.

externals (stem)

strings (s)

stringescapes {}

define stem as (
  test ([ tolimit ] <-'abcd') $(size == 4) or fail='<- replacement did not work as expected'
  test ([ tolimit ] <-'ok') $(size == 2) or fail='<- replacement did not work as expected (2)'

  test ([ tolimit ] <-'abcd' $(cursor == 4)) or fail='<- replacement did not adjust cursor as expected'
  test ([ tolimit ] <-'ok' $(cursor == 2)) or fail='<- replacement did not adjust cursor as expected (2)'

  test ([ tolimit ]) <-'abcd' $(cursor == 0) or fail='<- replacement did not adjust cursor as expected (3)'
  test ([ tolimit ]) <-'ok' $(cursor == 0) or fail='<- replacement did not adjust cursor as expected (4)'

  test ([ next ] delete <-'boo') test ('book' atlimit) or fail='delete did not adjust slice as expected'
  test ([ next ] <-'ch' <-'outl') test ('outlook' atlimit) or fail='<- did not adjust slice as expected'
  test (='abc' [ next ] ->s delete <-s) test ('abc' atlimit) or fail='stored slice did not survive later mutation'

  // Regression test for https://github.com/snowballstem/snowball/issues/242
  [] ->s $(sizeof s == 0) or fail='-> on empty slice was not empty'

  ='ok'
)
